Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Requirement that, in ruling or decision in mandamus or quo warranto proceeding or in case involving writ of prohibition, there be final judgment in trial court prior to appeal to Supreme Court, §

9-6-1

.

Certification of questions to Supreme Court by federal appellate courts, §

15-2-9

.

Number of votes of Justices of Supreme Court required for rendering of decision, §

15-2-16

.

Number of votes of Judges of Court of Appeals required for rendering of decision, §

15-3-1

.

Requirement of special license to practice before Supreme Court or Court of Appeals, §

15-19-1

.

5-6-1.
Appearance before court of interested third parties.

When a case is set for a hearing before the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals and there are parties besides the plaintiffs and defendants, whether shown by the record or not, who have a direct interest in its result, upon the interest being made to appear the court shall allow the other parties to appear by counsel on equal terms with the parties directly before the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1870, p. 47, § 5; Code 1873, § 4275; Code 1882, § 4275; Civil Code 1895, § 5581; Civil Code 1910, § 6196; Code 1933, § 6-1506.

5-6-2.
Disposition of transcript in appellate court.

The transcript of the record shall not be recorded by the clerk of the appellate court but shall be carefully labeled and filed so as to be found easily when needed.

History.

Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 454; Code 1863, § 4185; Code 1868, § 4224; Code 1873, § 4289; Code 1882, § 4289; Civil Code 1895, § 5590; Civil Code 1910, § 6209; Code 1933, § 6-1701.

Cross references.

Certification and transmittal of transcript and record, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 15.

5-6-3.
Filing of briefs on court order where cases not disposed of during term; additional argument; effect of failure to comply with order.

Whenever the appellate court may be unable to dispose of all cases on its docket for any term before the time fixed by law for the succeeding term to begin, the court may pass an order requiring counsel in all such cases to file their briefs in the clerk’s office of the court on or before a certain day prior to the succeeding term. All cases in which briefs are thus filed shall be considered as heard at the term of the court to which returned. They shall be determined and the decision therein shall be announced by the court as soon after the briefs are filed as may be practicable. Should the court desire to hear argument in addition to that submitted in the briefs, the court may pass an order requiring counsel to submit further argument by brief or in open court at such time as may be prescribed in the order.

Upon failure of counsel for the appellant to comply with the order of the court, where no sufficient excuse is shown for noncompliance, the case shall be dismissed for want of prosecution.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 151, §§ 1-4; Civil Code 1910, §§ 6198, 6199, 6200, 6201; Code 1933, §§ 6-1602, 6-1603, 6-1604, 6-1605.

Cross references.

Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. IX, Para. II.

Schedule of terms of Court of Appeals and Supreme Court, §§

15-2-4

,

15-3-2

.

Filings in clerk’s office, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

Filing with clerk’s office, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

5-6-4.
Bill of costs; payment of costs; exceptions to payment; prerequisite to receipt of application for appeal or brief by clerk.

The bill of costs for every application to the Supreme Court for a writ of certiorari or for applications for appeals filed in the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals or appeals to the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals shall be $80.00 in criminal cases and in habeas corpus cases for persons whose liberty is being restrained by virtue of a sentence imposed against them by a state court and $300.00 in all other civil cases. The costs shall be paid by counsel for the applicant or appellant at the time of the filing of the application or, in the case of direct appeals, at the time of the filing of the original brief of the appellant. In those cases in which the writ of certiorari or an application for appeal is granted, there shall be no additional costs.

Costs shall not be required when at the time the same are due:

The pro se applicant or pro se appellant is incarcerated at the time of the filing;

Counsel for the applicant or appellant was appointed to represent the defendant by the trial court because of the defendant’s indigency; or

The applicant, appellant, or counsel for applicant or appellant files an affidavit of indigency.

The clerk shall be prohibited from receiving the application for appeal or the brief of the appellant unless the costs have been paid or the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section have been satisfied.

History.

Ga. L. 1921, p. 239, § 1; Code 1933, § 6-1702; Ga. L. 1965, p. 650, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1186, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 411, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 644, § 1/HB 283; Ga. L. 2014, p. 222, § 1/HB 842.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote this Code section.

Cross references.

Payment by state of bill of costs in appeals or applications filed on behalf of state by a district attorney, §

15-18-13

.

Costs, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 11.

Costs, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 17.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (1991).

5-6-5.
Entry of judgment for costs on reversal.

If there is a judgment of reversal, the appellant shall be entitled to a judgment for the amount of the costs in the appellate court against the appellee as soon as the remittitur is returned to the court below.

History.

Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 251; Code 1863, § 4186; Code 1868, § 4225; Code 1873, § 4290; Code 1882, § 4290; Civil Code 1895, § 5591; Civil Code 1910, § 6210; Code 1933, § 6-1704.

5-6-6.
Damages for frivolous appeal.

When in the opinion of the court the case was taken up for delay only, 10 percent damages may be awarded by the appellate court upon any judgment for a sum certain which has been affirmed. The award shall be entered in the remittitur.

History.

Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 450; Code 1863, § 4182; Code 1868, § 4221; Code 1873, § 4286; Code 1882, § 4286; Civil Code 1895, § 5594; Civil Code 1910, § 6213; Code 1933, § 6-1801.

Cross references.

Penalty for frivolous appeals, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 14.

Appeals deemed frivolous, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 26.

Law reviews.

For survey of Georgia cases dealing with workers’ compensation from June 1, 1976 through May 31, 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 269 (1978).

For article, “Plying the Erie Waters: Choice of Law in the Deterrence of Frivolous Appeals,” see 21 Ga. L. Rev. 653 (1987).

For article, “Battling the Many-Headed Hydra: Abusive Litigation Law in Georgia,” see 25 Ga. St. B.J. 65 (1988).

For annual survey of construction law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2004).

For annual survey of law on appellate practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 25 (2010).

5-6-7.
No decisions to be rendered ore tenus; publication of judgments and opinions.

No decision shall be rendered ore tenus. The reporter shall publish in the official reports of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals all judgments, but only those opinions which the courts shall direct to be published.

History.

Ga. L. 1866, p. 46, § 5; Code 1868, § 4210; Code 1873, § 4270; Code 1882, § 4270; Civil Code 1895, § 5583; Civil Code 1910, § 6202; Code 1933, § 6-1606; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 9.

Cross references.

Motions for rehearing, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 48.

Law reviews.

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

For comment discussing the operation of stare decisis, in light of Walton v. Benton,

191 Ga. 548

,

13 S.E.2d 185

(1941), see 3 Ga. B.J. 62 (1941).

5-6-8.
Entry of decision on minutes; directions to lower court.

The decision in each case shall be entered on the minutes. It shall be within the power of the appellate court rendering the decision in a case to make such order and to give such direction as to the final disposition of the case by the lower court as may be consistent with the law and justice of the case.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4180; Code 1868, § 4219; Code 1873, § 4284; Code 1882, § 4284; Civil Code 1895, § 5586; Penal Code 1895, § 1068; Civil Code 1910, § 6205; Penal Code 1910, § 1095; Code 1933, § 6-1610.

5-6-9.
Transmittal of opinion to lower court generally.

Where a further hearing of the case is to follow in the lower court, the clerk of the appellate court shall transmit a copy of the opinion to the clerk of the lower court, without charge, as soon as the opinion is written out. The copy shall remain on file for the information of the court and the parties.

The appellate court, on rendering its decision in any case, shall instruct the clerk whether the case comes within the terms of this Code section; and a note of such instructions shall be entered on the minutes of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 106, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 5595, 5596; Civil Code 1910, §§ 6214, 6215; Code 1933, §§ 6-1802, 6-1803; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 5.

Cross references.

Transmittal of remittitur, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 49.

5-6-10.
Transmittal of remittitur to lower court generally.

The decision of the appellate court and any direction awarded in the case shall be certified by the clerk to the court below, under the seal of the court. The decision and direction shall be respected and carried into full effect in good faith by the court below. The remittitur shall contain nothing more, except the costs paid in the appellate court.

History.

Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 450; Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 455; Code 1863, § 4181; Code 1868, § 4220; Code 1873, § 4285; Code 1882, § 4285; Civil Code 1895, § 5597; Civil Code 1910, § 6216; Code 1933, § 6-1804.

Cross references.

Filing of remittitur and judgment, Uniform Superior Court Rules, Rule 38.

5-6-11.
Issuance of remittitur in cases involving death penalty.

In all cases where the Supreme Court of Georgia has affirmed the imposition of the death penalty in a case or has affirmed the denial of a petition for a writ of habeas corpus in any case in which the death penalty has been imposed, the remittitur shall not issue from that court for at least 90 days from the date of the court’s decision, or from the date of the court’s denial of a motion for a rehearing, if such motion is timely filed, whichever is later; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply where the defendant has previously applied for a writ of habeas corpus which has been denied and the denial thereof has been affirmed by the Supreme Court of Georgia, or where the writ has been granted but the grant thereof has been reversed by the Supreme Court of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 691, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 212, § 1.

Cross references.

Habeas corpus procedure for persons under sentence of state court of record, §

9-14-40

et seq.

Review of death sentences by Supreme Court, §

17-10-35

et seq.

Transmittal of remittiturs, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 60.

Filing of remittitur and judgment, Uniform Superior Court Rules, Rule 38.

5-6-12.
Cessation of supersedeas and issuance of execution upon affirmance of judgment of lower court.

If the judgment of the lower court is affirmed, upon the filing of the remittitur with the clerk of the court below, the supersedeas shall cease and execution shall issue at once for the amount of the original judgment.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4183; Code 1868, § 4222; Code 1873, § 4287; Code 1882, § 4287; Civil Code 1895, § 5598; Civil Code 1910, § 6217; Code 1933, § 6-1805.

Cross references.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 12.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 50.

5-6-13.
Granting of supersedeas in cases of contempt.

A judge of any trial court or tribunal having the power to adjudge and punish for contempt shall grant to any person convicted of or adjudged to be in contempt of court a supersedeas upon application and compliance with the provisions of law as to appeal and certiorari, where the person also submits, within the time prescribed by law, written notice that he intends to seek review of the conviction or adjudication of contempt. It shall not be in the discretion of any trial court judge to grant or refuse a supersedeas in cases of contempt.

This Code section shall not apply to contempt in the presence of the court during the progress of a proceeding.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 260, § 1.

Cross references.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 12.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 50.

Law reviews.

For article, “Jury Trials in Contempt Cases,” see 20 Ga. B.J. 297 (1957).

For article on domestic relations, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 65 (2014).

For article, “How Not to Get Thrown in Jail,” see 22 Ga. Bar. J. 17 (June 2017).

5-6-14.
Execution of extraordinary orders.

When judgments are rendered on appeal in injunction or other extraordinary cases, the judges of the superior courts may give immediate effect to such judgments.

History.

Ga. L. 1870, p. 405, § 5; Code 1873, § 3215; Code 1882, § 3215; Civil Code 1895, § 5599; Civil Code 1910, § 6218; Code 1933, § 6-1806; Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 3-2/HB 927.

The 2016 amendment,

effective January 1, 2017, substituted “on appeal” for “in the Supreme Court” in the middle of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 12.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 1-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Appellate Jurisdiction Reform Act of 2016.’ ”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 6-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Part III of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2017, and shall apply to cases in which a notice of appeal or application to appeal is filed on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2016).

5-6-15.
Certiorari from Supreme Court to Court of Appeals.

The writ of certiorari shall lie from the Supreme Court to the Court of Appeals as provided by Article VI, Section VI, Paragraph V of the Constitution of this state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3957; Code 1868, § 3977; Code 1873, § 4049; Code 1882, § 4049; Civil Code 1895, § 4634; Civil Code 1910, § 5180; Code 1933, § 19-101; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 47.

Cross references.

Certiorari to the Court of Appeals, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rules 28 et seq.

Applications, how made, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 16.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of domestic relations law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 221 (2004).

5-6-16.
Time for appeal by personal representative where party dies after trial; effect of entry of appeal and of failure to enter appeal; when appeal heard.

When either the plaintiff or the defendant dies after a case has been tried and before the expiration of the time within which the party, if living, might have entered an appeal, and no appeal has been entered, the personal representative of the estate of the deceased party may enter an appeal within 30 days from the time such personal representative qualifies.

If an appeal is not entered within the time prescribed in this Code section, judgment may be entered and execution issued as though the deceased party were alive, without making the personal representative a party.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “personal representative” includes temporary administrators, subject to the provisions of Code Sections 53-6-31 and 53-7-4.

When an appeal is entered as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall not be necessary to revive the action, but it shall be revived by the appealing party giving notice to the adverse party within 30 days from the time of entering the appeal.

When a defendant appeals as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the case shall stand for trial on the appeal docket at the first term of the court after the expiration of six months from the qualification of the personal representative.

Nothing in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) or paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall impair the operation or limit the applicability of Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 53.

History.

Laws 1843, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 474, 502; Code 1863, §§ 3358, 3359, 3361; Code 1868, §§ 3377, 3378, 3380; Code 1873, §§ 3425, 3426, 3428; Code 1882, §§ 3425, 3426, 3428; Civil Code 1895, §§ 5023, 5024, 5026; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5605, 5606, 5608; Code 1933, §§ 3-408, 3-409, 3-411; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 2-1/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), designated the first sentence as paragraph (a)(1) and the second sentence as paragraph (a)(2), in paragraph (a)(1), substituted “personal” for “legal”, inserted “estate of the”, and substituted “such personal representative” for “he”, inserted “personal” in paragraph (a)(2), and added paragraph (a)(3); in subsection (b), designated the first sentence as paragraph (b)(1) and the second sentence as paragraph (b)(2), inserted “paragraph (1) of” in paragraph (b)(1), and in paragraph (b)(2), inserted “as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section” and substituted “personal representative” for “executor or administrator”; and rewrote subsection (c), which read: “In case of the death or removal from office of any executor or administrator pending such proceedings as are prescribed in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, an administrator de bonis non may be made a party in like manner.”

Cross references.

Death of party, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 10.

Parties, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 39.